es: Modo de conteo del temporizador: Cuenta progresiva (cronómetro); Cuenta regresiva; Cuenta progresiva y regresiva; Intervalo/repetición; Otro
zh-CN: 计时器计数模式: 正计时（秒表）; 倒计时; 正计时和倒计时; 间歇/重复; 其他
sv: Timer-räkningsläge: Räkna upp (stoppur); Nedräkning; Räknar upp och ned; Intervall/repeterande; Annat
da: Tællefunktion for timeren: Tæl op (stopur); Nedtælling; Tæller op og ned; Interval/gentagende; Andet
pl: Sposób odmierzania czasu: Odliczanie w górę (stoper); Odliczanie w dół; Odliczanie w górę i w dół; Interwał / powtarzanie; Inne
de: Zählmodus des Timers: Aufwärtszählend (Stoppuhr); Countdown; Auf- und abwärtszählend; Intervall / Wiederholend; Sonstige
th: Modeนับเวลา: นับเดินหน้า (นาฬิกาจับเวลา); นับถอยหลัง; นับเดินหน้าและถอยหลัง; เป็นช่วงเวลา / ซ้ำ; อื่นๆ
sk-SK: Režim počítania časovača: Odpočítavanie nahor (stopky); Odpočítavanie nadol; Odpočítavanie nahor a nadol; Intervalové/opakujúce sa; Iné
el: Λειτουργία μέτρησης χρόνου: Χρονόμετρο (αύξουσα μέτρηση); Αντίστροφη μέτρηση; Αύξουσα και αντίστροφη μέτρηση; Διαλειμματική / επαναλαμβανόμενη; Άλλο
en: Timer count mode: Count up (stopwatch); Countdown; Counts up and down; Interval / repeating; Other
cs: Režim časovače: Odpočítávání nahoru (stopky); Odpočítávání; Odpočítává nahoru i dolů; Interval / opakování; Ostatní
sl-SI: Način odštevanja/številčenja časovnika: Štetje naprej (štoparica); Odštevanje; Štetje naprej in nazaj; Intervalno / ponavljajoče; Drugo
it: Modalità di conteggio del timer: Conteggio in avanti (cronometro); Conto alla rovescia; Conteggio in avanti e indietro; Intervallo / ripetizione; Altro
nl: Timer telmodus: Optellen (stopwatch); Aftellen; Optellen en aftellen; Interval/herhalend; Overige
pt-PT: Modo de contagem do temporizador: Contagem crescente (cronómetro); Contagem decrescente; Contagem crescente e decrescente; Intervalo/repetição; Outro
ru: Режим отсчета таймера: Прямой отсчет (секундомер); Обратный отсчет; Прямой и обратный отсчет; Интервальный/повторяющийся; Другое
ko: 타이머 카운트 방식: 카운트업(스톱워치); 카운트다운; 카운트업 및 다운; 인터벌/반복; 기타
ro-RO: Mod de contorizare al temporizatorului: Cronometrare crescătoare (cronometru); Numărătoare inversă; Cronometrare crescătoare și descrescătoare; Interval / repetare; Altele
hu: Időzítő számláló Mode: Felfelé számolás (stopper); Visszaszámlálás; Felfelé és lefelé számolás; Intervallum / ismétlődő; Egyéb
bg-BG: Режим на отчитане на таймера: Отброяване напред (хронометър); Отброяване назад; Отброява напред и назад; Интервал/повтаряне; Друго
hr-HR: Način odbrojavanja tajmera: Odbrojavanje prema naprijed (štoperica); Odbrojavanje; Odbrojavanje prema naprijed i nazad; Interval / ponavljanje; Ostalo
pt-BR: Temporizador modo de contagem: Contagem progressiva (cronômetro); Contagem regressiva; Contagem progressiva e regressiva; Intervalo / repetição; Outros
vi: Chế độ đếm hẹn giờ: Đếm tới (bấm giờ); Đếm ngược; Đếm tới và đếm ngược; Ngắt quãng / lặp lại; Khác
ja: タイマーのカウントモード: カウントアップ (ストップウォッチ); カウントダウン; カウントアップおよびダウン; インターバル / リピート; その他
fi: Ajastimen laskentatila: Ajanotto ylöspäin (sekuntikello); Lähtölaskenta; Ajanotto ja lähtölaskenta; Intervalli / toistuva; Muu
fr: Mode de comptage du minuteur: Chronomètre (comptage croissant); Compte à rebours; Comptage croissant et décroissant; Intervalle / répétition; Autre
lt-LT: Laikmačio skaičiavimo režimas: Skaičiavimas pirmyn (chronometras); Atgalinis skaičiavimas; Skaičiavimas pirmyn ir atgal; Intervalas / pasikartojantis; Kitas
tr: Zamanlayıcı sayım modu: İleri sayım (kronometre); Geri sayım; İleri ve geri sayım; Aralık / tekrarlanan; Diğer
nb: Tidtakermodus: Telle oppover (stoppeklokke); Nedtelling; Teller opp og ned; Intervall/gjentakende; Annet
zh-TW: 計時器計時模式: 正數 (碼錶); 倒數; 正數和倒數; 間歇 / 重複; 其他